Utah statutes.
11-14-405.   Validity of prior bond issues.

All bonds issued by any local political subdivision before May 1, 2006, and all proceedings had in the authorization and issuance of those bonds are hereby validated, ratified, and confirmed, and all those bonds are declared to constitute legally binding obligations in accordance with their terms.  Nothing in this section may be construed to affect or validate any bonds, the legality of which is being contested as of May 1, 2006.



Amended by Chapter 83, 2006 General Session

